apertium-si-ta.si.dix
    <pardef n="ඔබලා/__prn">
    	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගේ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
		
		 <!--TODO: Add for passive voice-->
		 
		<pardef n="ඔහු/__prn">
    	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගේ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
		<pardef n="ඇ/ය__prn">
    	<e><p><l>ය</l><r>ය<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගේ</l><r>ය<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>යට</l><r>ය<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r>ය<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r>ය<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ඔවු/හු__prn">
    	<e><p><l>හු</l><r>හු<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>න්ගේ</l><r>හු<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>න්ට</l><r>හු<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>න්ගෙන්</l><r>හු<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>න්ව</l><r>හු<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
   <!-- SECTION: Determiners --> 
   <pardef n="එ/ය__det">
    	<e><p><l>ය</l><r>ය<s n="det"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>හි</l><r>ය<s n="det"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>යට</l><r>ය<s n="det"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>යින්</l><r>ය<s n="det"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ක</l><r>ය<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>වා</l><r>ය<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
		<pardef n="අර/__det">
			<e><p><l>ක</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>වා</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="යම/__det">
			<e><p><l>ක්</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		
		<!-- SECTION: Nouns --> 
		
	<pardef n="අම්මා/__n">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ගේ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ව</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වරු</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වරුන්ගේ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වරුන්ට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වරුන්ගෙන්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වරුන්ව</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="ළම/යා__n">
		<e><p><l>යා</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යෙක්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යෙකු</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යාගේ</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යාට</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යාගෙන්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යාව</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යි</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යින්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යින්ගේ</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l> යිින්ට</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යින්ගෙන්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යින්ව</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="ළම/යා__n">
		<e><p><l>යා</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යෙක්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යෙකු</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යාගේ</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යාට</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යාගෙන්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යාව</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යි</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යින්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යින්ගේ</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l> යිින්ට</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යින්ගෙන්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යින්ව</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="මිනි/සා__n">
		<e><p><l>සා</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>සෙක්</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>සෙකු</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>සාගේ</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>සාට</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>සාගෙන්</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>සාව</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ස්සු</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>සුන්</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>සුන්ගේ</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>සුන්ට</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>සුන්ගෙන්</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>සුන්ව</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	

		<e lm="ඔබලා"><i>ඔබලා</i><par n="ඔබලා/__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="ඔහු"><i>ඔහු</i><par n="ඔහු/__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="ඇ"><i>ඇ</i><par n="ඇ/ය__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="ඔවු"><i>ඔවු</i><par n="ඔවු/හු__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="එ"><i>එ</i><par n="එ/ය__det"/></e>
		<e lm="මෙ"><i>මෙ</i><par n="එ/ය__det"/></e>
		<e lm="අර"><i>අර</i><par n="අර/__det"/></e>
		<e lm="යම"><i>යම</i><par n="යම/__det"/></e>
		<e lm="අම්මා"><i>අම්මා</i><par n="අම්මා/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ළමයා"><i>ළම</i><par n="ළම/යා__n"/></e>
		<e lm="මිනිසා"><i>මිනි</i><par n="මිනි/සා__n"/></e>
